test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Pron-muu_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Pronoun - mū: # pronouns 3 'eng /est muu/fin' - full paradigm
     mū+Pron+Sg+Nom: mū
     mū+Pron+Sg+Gen: mū
     mū+Pron+Sg+Par: mūdõ
     mū+Pron+Sg+Dat: mūn
     mū+Pron+Sg+Ins: mūkõks
     mū+Pron+Sg+Ill: [mūʼzõ, mūzõ]
     mū+Pron+Sg+Ela: mūstõ
     mū+Pron+Pl+Nom: munt
     mū+Pron+Pl+Gen: munt 
     mū+Pron+Pl+Par: mūḑi
     mū+Pron+Pl+Dat: muntõn
     mū+Pron+Pl+Ins: muntkõks
     mū+Pron+Pl+Ill: [mūʼži, mūži]
     mū+Pron+Pl+Ela: mūšti
